Utah statutes.
78B-12-108.   Support follows the child.

(1)  Obligations ordered for child support and medical expenses are for the use and benefit of the child and shall follow the child.

(2)  Except in cases of joint physical custody and split custody as defined in Section 78B-12-102, when physical custody changes from that assumed in the original order, the parent without physical custody of a child shall be required to pay the amount of support determined in accordance with Sections 78B-12-205 and 78B-12-212, without the need to modify the order for:

(a)  the parent who has physical custody of the child;

(b)  a relative to whom physical custody of the child has been voluntarily given; or

(c)  the state when the child is residing outside of the home in the protective custody, temporary custody, or custody or care of the state or a state-licensed facility for at least 30 days.

